Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1207
Annual statement; contents; examination; power of department.

Such attorney shall, within the time limited for filing the annual statement by insurance companies transacting the same kind of business, make a report to the Department of Insurance for each calendar year, showing the financial condition of affairs at the office where such contracts were issued, and shall furnish such additional information and reports as may be required; Provided, however, that the attorney shall not be required to file the names and addresses of any subscribers. The business affairs, records and assets of such organization shall be subject to examination by the department at the expense of the organization examined.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 7, p. 461;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 7, p. 684;

C.S.1922, § 7975;

C.S.1929, § 44-1507;

R.S.1943, § 44-1207.